Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-212 Prevention of insolvencies.
(a) To aid in the detection and prevention of insurer insolvencies or
impairments, it shall be the duty of the commissioner:

(1) To notify the commissioners of all the other
states, territories of the United States, and the District of Columbia when the
commissioner takes any of the following actions against a member insurer:

(A) Revocation of license;

(B) Suspension of license; or

(C) Makes any formal order that the company
restrict its premium writing, obtain additional contributions to surplus,
withdraw from the State, reinsure all or any part of its business, or increase
capital, surplus, or any other account for the security of policyholders or
creditors.

The notice shall be mailed to all commissioners
within thirty days following the action taken or the date on which the action
occurs;

(2) To report to the board of directors when the
commissioner has taken any of the actions set forth in paragraph (1) or has
received a report from any other commissioner indicating that any such action
has been taken in another state. The report to the board of directors shall
contain all significant details of the action taken or the report received from
another commissioner;

(3) To report to the board of directors when the
commissioner has reasonable cause to believe from any examination, whether
completed or in process, of any member company that the company may be an
impaired or insolvent insurer; and

(4) To furnish to the board of directors the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners Insurance Regulatory Information System
(IRIS) ratios and listings of companies not included in the ratios developed by
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, and the board may use the
information contained therein in carrying out its duties and responsibilities
under this section. The report and the information contained therein shall be
kept confidential by the board of directors until such time as made public by
the commissioner or other lawful authority.

(b) The commissioner may seek the advice and
recommendations of the board of directors concerning any matter affecting the
commissioner's duties and responsibilities regarding the financial condition of
member companies and companies seeking admission to transact insurance business
in this State.

(c) The board of directors may, upon majority
vote, make reports and recommendations to the commissioner upon any matter
germane to the solvency, liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation of any
member insurer or germane to the solvency of any company seeking to do an
insurance business in this State. The reports and recommendations shall not be
considered public documents.

(d) It shall be the duty of the board of
directors, upon majority vote, to notify the commissioner of any information
indicating any member insurer may be an impaired insurer or insolvent insurer.

(e) The board of directors may, upon majority
vote, request that the commissioner order an examination of any member insurer
which the board in good faith believes may be an impaired or insolvent
insurer. Within thirty days of the receipt of such request, the commissioner
shall begin the examination. The examination may be conducted as a National
Association of Insurance Commissioners' examination or may be conducted by such
persons as the commissioner designates. The cost of the examination shall be
paid by the association and the examination report shall be treated as are
other examination reports. In no event shall the examination report be released
to the board of directors prior to its release to the public, but this shall
not excuse the commissioner from complying with subsection (a). The
commissioner shall notify the board of directors when the examination is
completed. The request for an examination shall be kept on file by the
commissioner but it shall not be open to public inspection prior to the release
of the examination report to the public.

(f) The board of directors may, upon majority
vote, make recommendations to the commissioner for the detection and prevention
of insurer insolvencies.

(g) The board of directors shall, at the
conclusion of any insurer insolvency in which the association was obligated to
pay covered claims, prepare a report to the commissioner containing such
information as it may have in its possession bearing on the history and causes
of such insolvency. The board shall cooperate with the board of directors of
guaranty associations in other states in preparing a report on the history and
causes for insolvency of a particular insurer, and may adopt by reference any
report prepared by such other associations. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; gen ch
1993; am L 2004, c 122, §76; am L 2012, c 250, §10]

Note

The 2012 amendment shall not apply to any proceedings in which
a member insurer is placed under an order of liquidation prior to July 1,
2012. L 2012, c 250, §15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next